Washington statutes.
RCW 41.04.362

Employee wellness program.

(1) Directors of state and local entities, in consultation with applicable state agencies and employee organizations, may develop and administer a voluntary state employee wellness program.

(2) A director may:

(a) Develop and implement state employee wellness policies, procedures, and activities;

(b) Disseminate wellness educational materials to agencies and employees;

(c) Encourage the establishment of wellness activities in agencies;

(d) Provide technical assistance and training to agencies conducting wellness activities for their employees;

(e) Develop standards by which agencies sponsoring specific wellness activities may impose a fee to participating employees to help defray the cost of those activities;

(f) Monitor and evaluate the effectiveness of this program, including the collection, analysis, and publication of relevant statistical information; and

(g) Perform other duties and responsibilities as necessary to carry out the purpose of this section.

(3) No wellness program or activity that involves or requires organized or systematic physical exercise may be implemented or conducted during normal working hours.

[ 2010 c 128 s 4; 1987 c 248 s 2.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Purpose—1987 c 248: "The legislature finds that:

(1) Improved health among employees will result in a more productive workforce, better morale, reduced stress, lower injury rates and absenteeism, and improved recruitment and retention rates;

(2) A substantial amount of illness and injury in the workforce is preventable because it results from lifestyle decisions;

(3) Illness and injury among state employees can be reduced if employees engage in healthier lifestyles.

The state, as an employer, desires to foster a working environment that promotes the health and well-being of its employees. Therefore, it is the purpose of this act to establish a state employee wellness program. "Wellness program" means those policies, procedures, and activities that promote the health and well-being of state employees and that contribute to a healthful work environment." [ 1987 c 248 s 1.]